Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 341.565 is amended to read:
341.565. (1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall constitute the boundary  board
for making any changes  in the boundaries of community college districts. The commission on its own
motion or on petition from a petitioning territory may propose changes in the  boundaries of a
community college  district. The commission must find that the proposed change will have no sub-
stantially adverse effect upon the ability of the affected districts to provide and continue their  pro-
grams and is not made solely for tax advantages to property owners in the  district or area affected
by the proposed change.  The commission may submit the question of a boundary change to a vote
of the electors of the territories affected by the boundary change. The election  must be held on the
same day in [ both] each of the affected territories.
(2) A petition  shall be in a form prescribed by the commission and must contain the information
that the commission requires. The petition shall :
(a) Contain a minimum number of signatures as fixed by the commission ; and
(b) Be either received by the commission, or  mailed to the commission as evidenced by
a postmark date, no later than 90 days after the date  the first signature on the petition is
recorded.
(3)(a) Before any  order changing boundaries of an existing district is entered, the commission
shall set dates for a public hearing in the area to be included in the district or excluded from  the
district by the proposed boundary change and , in the case  of annexation of new territory , in the
principal town of the existing district that annexes the  new territory.  [ and] The commission
shall give notice of the public hearing  in the manner required in ORS 341.357.
(b) At the time set in the notice, the commission or its authorized representative shall conduct
a public hearing on the motion or petition and may adjourn the hearing from time to time.
(c) If the commission determines that it is unable to  locate a suitable venue to hold a
public hearing in an area described in paragraph  (a) of this subsection, the commission shall
hold the public hearing at a  suitable venue that is as close to the area described in paragraph
(a) of this subsection as the commission can reasonably locate.
(4)(a) If, upon final hearing, the commission approves the motion or  petition or affirms the vote
of the electors of the affected territories, the commission shall :
(A) Make an order describing the revised boundaries of the district ; and
Enrolled House Bill 2090 (HB 2090-INTRO) Page 1
(B) Not sooner than 20 days after making the order, submit a copy  of the order to the
Legislative Assembly for approval .
(b) The order becomes final when the order is approved by the Legislative Assembly.
(A) If the order is not  approved, the commission may revise the order and resubmit the order
to the Legislative Assembly but not sooner than 60 days after the action of disapproval was taken.
(B) If the Legislative Assembly fails  to take any action on an order submitted under this
subsection, the commission may resubmit an  unrevised order to the Legislative Assembly
without holding the public hearings described in subsection (3) of this section.
(5) Any division of assets and liabilities required by a change in the boundaries  of a district
shall be made pursuant to ORS 341.573.
(6) When the boundaries of a district are changed, if the final order  of the commission or an
election held under ORS 341.569:
(a) Occurs between July 1 and March  31, inclusive, the change takes effect on the June 30 fol-
lowing the final order or election favoring the change.
(b) Occurs between April 1 and June 30, inclusive, the change takes effect on the  June 30 of the
following year.
(7) For purposes of ad valorem taxation, a boundary change must be filed in final  approved form
with the county assessor and the Department of Revenue as provided in ORS 308.225.
SECTION 2.  ORS 341.569 is amended to read:
341.569. (1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall  submit the question of a pro-
posed boundary change to a vote if:
(a) The commission enters the order to revise the boundaries of a community college district;
(b) A remonstrance is filed with the commission within 20  days after the date on which the
commission enters the order  [ hearing under ORS 341.565 is adjourned finally ];
(c) The remonstrance is signed by  at least five percent of the electors or at least 500 of the
electors, whichever is less, in:
(A) An area to be included in the district or excluded from the district by the proposed boundary
change; or
(B) The existing community college district; [ and]
(d) The area to be included in the district is not surrounded by the  territory of a single com-
munity college district ; and
(e) The  Legislative Assembly appropriates to the commission moneys to conduct the
election.
(2) When necessary under subsection (1) of this section, the question shall be submitted to the
electors of [ the] each  area or district [ filing a remonstrance  or in both if remonstrances ] that files
a remonstrance  meeting the requirements of subsection (1) of this section [ are filed from both ].
(3) If the proposed  boundary change is defeated, the same or a substantially similar change may
not be considered until at least 12 months have elapsed from  the date of the election at which the
change was defeated. If the vote  is favorable in the area or district from which a remonstrance was
filed, the commission shall declare the change effective on the date determined under ORS 341.565.
SECTION 3.
 ORS 341.573 is amended to read:
341.573. (1) When changes in district boundaries are made by the detachment of territory or  an
annexation of territory and  another community college district is affected, the boards of the districts
shall make an  equitable division of the then existing assets and liabilities between the districts af-
fected by such change and provide the manner of consummating the division.
(2) In  case of failure to agree within 20 days from the time of such change, the matter shall be
decided by a board of arbitrators.  The board of arbitrators shall consist of one member appointed
by each of the boards  of the affected districts and an additional member appointed by the other
appointees.
(3) In the event any such board fails to appoint an arbitrator within  30 days, the Higher Edu-
cation  Coordinating  Commission shall appoint such arbitrator. In the event the arbitrators selected
fail to appoint the  additional arbitrator within 30 days after the appointment of the arbitrator last
Enrolled House Bill 2090 (HB 2090-INTRO) Page 2
appointed, the  commission shall notify the judge senior in service of the circuit court of the princi-
pal county. Within 10 days after receiving such notice, the  judge shall appoint one additional
arbitrator.
(4) Each member of the board of  arbitrators shall be entitled to the sum of $100 per day for each
day’s service, and necessary expenses,  while serving in the official capacity of the member. Ex-
penses thus incurred shall be equally apportioned among the districts concerned.
(5) A  party to an arbitration under this section may seek confirmation, vacation, modification
or correction of the arbitrator’s decision as provided in ORS  36.700, 36.705 and 36.710. A court may
vacate an award only if there is a basis to vacate the award described in ORS 36.705 (1)(a) to (d).
The court may modify or correct an award only for the grounds given in ORS 36.710.
(6) Assets include all property and  moneys belonging to the district at the time of division. Li-
abilities include all debts for which the respective districts in their corporate capacities are  liable
at the time of division. In determining the assets, property shall be  estimated at its fair value. The
assets and liabilities shall be divided between the districts in proportion  to the last assessed value
of the real and personal property. The district retaining the  real property shall pay the other dis-
tricts concerned such sums as are determined in accordance with the provisions  of this section. All
funds to be apportioned during the current fiscal year, after such division, shall be made  in pro-
portion to the number of persons in each district according to the latest federal census.
(7) This section  does not apply to state aid distributed by the commission under ORS
341.626.
(8) When changes in district boundaries arise  by detaching a territory that will not be
incorporated into an existing or new community college district:
(a) The existing district from which the territory is detached shall retain the rights  to
all assets belonging to the district at the time of the change in district boundaries; and
(b) Except as provided in ORS 341.575, the existing district shall also retain responsibility
for all liabilities of the district.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 341.575 is amended to read:
341.575. (1) When territory is annexed to or merged with a community college district,  the new
territory shall become liable for its share of the existing debt of the community college district.
(2) When territory is detached from a community college  district, the detached territory
shall remain liable for its share of the bonded indebtedness  assumed by the community col-
lege district during the period of time the detached territory was included in the district.
Enrolled House Bill 2090 (HB 2090-INTRO) Page 3
Passed by House March 15, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 11, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2090 (HB 2090-INTRO) Page 4